Ohio, session 136, SB257.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. (A) The Support Children's Overall 4
Psychological and Emotional Health (SCOPE) Pilot Program is 5
established in collaboration between the Department of Health 6
and the Department of Behavioral Health. The purpose of the 7
SCOPE Pilot Program is to provide mental health services to 8
individuals eligible for the Program for Children and Youth with 9
Special Health Care Needs under sections 3701.021 to 3701.028 of 10
the Revised Code. 11
(B) The SCOPE Pilot Program shall address mental health 12
conditions that are commonly experienced by children and 13
families managing complex medical issues. The Department of 14
Health and the Department of Behavioral Health shall work 15
collaboratively to initiate and oversee the delivery of mental 16
health services under the Pilot Program, including all of the 17
following: 18
(1) Identifying mental health conditions that warrant 19

S. B. No. 257 Page 2
As Introduced
treatment under the Pilot Program, which shall include medical- 20
induced post-traumatic stress disorder, anxiety, depression, and 21
any other conditions that may arise from the stress and trauma 22
of enduring ongoing or serious medical conditions; 23
(2) Describing the services to be provided under the Pilot 24
Program, which shall include outpatient care, counseling, and 25
the medication for the treatment of mental health conditions; 26
(3) Establishing criteria for the provision of services 27
under the Pilot Program; 28
(4) Generating a list of providers to provide services 29
under the Pilot Program. 30
(C) The Department of Health shall inform families who are 31
eligible for the Program for Children and Youth with Special 32
Health Care Needs under sections 3701.021 to 3701.028 of the 33
Revised Code about the SCOPE Pilot Program. The Pilot Program 34
shall operate independently from the Program for Children and 35
Youth with Special Health Care Needs. 36
(D) The SCOPE Pilot Program terminates after one year or 37
when funding is exhausted, whichever occurs first. Upon the 38
termination of the Pilot Program, the Department of Health and 39
Department of Behavioral Health jointly shall survey 40
participating families to assess the Pilot Program's 41
effectiveness. 42
Section 2. All items in this act are hereby appropriated 43
as designated out of any moneys in the state treasury to the 44
credit of the designated fund. For all operating appropriations 45
made in this act, those in the first column are for fiscal year 46
2026 and those in the second column are for fiscal year 2027. 47
The operating appropriations made in this act are in addition to 48

S. B. No. 257 Page 3
As Introduced
any other operating appropriations made for these fiscal years. 49
Section 3. 50
51
1 2 3 4 5
A DOH DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
B General Revenue Fund
C GRF 440485 Health Program Support $500,000 $0
D TOTAL GRF General Revenue Fund $500,000 $0
E TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $500,000 $0
HEALTH PROGRAM SUPPORT 52
The foregoing appropriation item 440485, Health Program 53
Support, shall be used to support the Support Children's Overall 54
Psychological and Emotional Health (SCOPE) Pilot Program in 55
accordance with Section 1 of this act. 56
On July 1, 2026, or as soon as possible thereafter, the 57
Director of Job and Family Services may certify to the Director 58
of Budget and Management an amount up to the unexpended, 59
unencumbered balance of the foregoing appropriation item 440485, 60
Health Program Support, at the end of fiscal year 2026 to be 61
reappropriated for fiscal year 2027. The amount certified is 62
hereby reappropriated to the same appropriation item for fiscal 63
year 2027. 64
Section 4. Within the limits set forth in this act, the 65
Director of Budget and Management shall establish accounts 66
indicating the source and amount of funds for each appropriation 67

S. B. No. 257 Page 4
As Introduced
made in this act, and shall determine the manner in which 68
appropriation accounts shall be maintained. Expenditures from 69
operating appropriations contained in this act shall be 70
accounted for as though made in, and are subject to all 71
applicable provisions of, H.B. 96 of the 136th General Assembly. 72